Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2358
Public power and irrigation district funds; depositories; duty of treasurer to keep list of securities.

The treasurer or other competent officer of the district shall at all times keep and certify to the district a complete and correct list and description of the securities furnished by any depository. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1941, c. 160, § 2, p. 642;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2538;

R.S.1943, § 77-2358;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 71;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 47;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 67.